Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 13 Ad Valorem Taxation
Twenty-three cents ($.23) per mile for necessary travel and not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) for advertising in the case of sale of personal property and not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) for advertising in the case of sale of real property to collect delinquent taxes;

Not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) for issuing a certificate of purchase;

Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for issuing a treasurer’s deed to a private purchaser;

Not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) for issuing a certificate of redemption.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 3; 2001, ch. 177, § 1; 2003, ch. 62, § 1; 2017 ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 187, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 141, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 142, § 2, effective March 24, 2020; 2021 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to actions to enjoin illegal collection of or to recover back taxes, see §

39-13-109

.

As to sufficiency of tax title to protect occupying claimant of real estate with reference to conditions under which claimant is to be paid for improvements, see §

1-32-208

.

As to tax title being sufficient to protect occupant in demanding the value of improvements, see §

1-32-208

.

As to rights of purchaser where sale for taxes invalid, see §

1-17-332

.

As to receipt and disbursement of public funds, see §

9-4-101

et seq.

As to foreclosure of mortgages and power of sale, see chapter 4 of title 34.

As to service of process generally, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (d)(vi)(B), added the last sentence; and in (d)(vi)(O), added the last sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d)(vi)(A), added the second sentence, in the introductory language in (d)(vi)(C), added the first sentence, the proviso to the second sentence, "related to mineral production before January 1, 2021" following "this paragraph," "held by any person" following "any kind," "if the county fails to" at the end, added (d)(vi)(C)(I) and (d)(vi)(C)(II), and made related changes, in (d)(vi)(D), added "subject to the priorities in subparagraph (C)" following "discretion," in the introductory language in (d)(vi)(E), added "or bring an action to enforce or foreclose" following "to perfect" in the first sentence, "enforce or foreclose" following "to perfect" in the second sentence, and added the third sentence, in (d)(vi)(E)(IV), added "of the mineral estate of the taxpayer" following "premises," and in (d)(vi)(F), added "or bring an action to enforce or foreclose" following "to perfect."

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 141, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (d)(vi), added “before January 1, 2021”; in (d)(vi)(A), deleted “. For any lien related to mineral production on or after January 1, 2021, the county lien is perpetual against all persons excluding the United States and the state of Wyoming and attaches and is perfected immediately upon production of the mineral” from the first and second sentence, and deleted “delinquent” preceding “taxpayer to the extent” in the last sentence; in (d)(vi)(B), deleted “delinquent” preceding “taxpayer in the mineral estate”; in (d)(vi)(C), substituted “Any” for “For any lien related to mineral production on or after January 1, 2021, a county lien arising under this paragraph is superior and paramount to all other liens, claims, mortgages or any other encumbrance of any kind except as provided in subparagraph (A) of this section and the lien shall survive foreclosure actions until paid in full or until released by the lienholder. Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,” and deleted “related to mineral production before January 1, 2021” following “Any lien arising under this paragraph”; in (d)(vi)(E)(V), added “regardless of any change of ownership or change in the person extracting the mineral. Any new owner or new person extracting the mineral shall not be subject to a prior lien under this paragraph if the new owner or new person extracting the mineral furnishes evidence of a certification from the applicable taxing authorities to the previous owner or previous person extracting the mineral that at the time of the sale or transfer to the new owner or new person extracting the mineral, payment of all state and local taxes imposed upon mineral production was current or the applicable taxing authorities had released, settled or agreed to other payment terms” to the end; in (d)(vi)(O), in the first sentence, substituted “any” for “the legal” following “any person who has,” added “full” preceding “payment,” substituted “for payment of the” for “of such” following “date due,” in the second sentence, added “or” preceding “a person severing,” substituted a period for “if the person has the legal responsibility for remittance of ad valorem tax, fees, penalties or interest on the mineral production,” in the third sentence, substituted “shall” for “does” at the beginning, and deleted “and legally responsible for remitting ad valorem taxes, fees, penalties or interest on production” following “producing the mineral”; and added (d)(vii).

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 142, § 2, in (b)(i), added “Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

39-13-113

,” at the beginning; in (b)(ii), added “W.S.

39-13-113

or” following “provided by”; in (c)(ii)(C), added “W.S. 39-13-113 or” in the first sentence.

Laws 2020, ch. 142, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted the last sentence of (d)(vi)(E)(V), which read, "Any new owner or new person extracting the mineral shall not be subject to a prior lien under this paragraph if the new owner or new person extracting the mineral furnishes evidence of a certification from the applicable taxing authorities to the previous owner or previous person extracting the mineral that at the time of the sale or transfer to the new owner or new person extracting the mineral, payment of all state and local taxes imposed upon mineral production was current or the applicable taxing authorities had released, settled or agreed to other payment terms"; deleted the last sentence of (d)(vii)(C), which read, "Any new owner or new person extracting the mineral shall not be subject to a prior lien under this paragraph if the new owner or new person extracting the mineral furnishes evidence of a certification from the applicable taxing authorities to the previous owner or previous person extracting the mineral that at the time of the sale or transfer to the new owner or new person extracting the mineral, payment of all state and local taxes imposed upon mineral production was current or the applicable taxing authorities had released, settled or agreed to other payment terms"; and, in the first sentence of (d)(vii)(E), deleted "pursuant to a tax sale under subsection (e) of this section" following "paragraph," and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (e)(ii)(I), (d)(vi)(I) or (d)(vi)(L) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 187 § 2, provides: “This act applies to any county ad valorem tax lien perfected on or after July 1, 2019.”

I. General Consideration.

II. Assessment Process.

III. Tax Sale Process.